Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-358.01
Utility-type vehicle, defined.

(1) Utility-type vehicle means any motorized off-highway vehicle which (a) is seventy-four inches in width or less, (b) is not more than one hundred eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, and (c) travels on four or more nonhighway tires. Utility-type vehicles which have been modified or retrofitted with after-market parts to include additional equipment not required by sections 60-6,357 and 60-6,358 shall not be registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, nor shall such modified or retrofitted vehicles be eligible for registration in any other category of vehicle defined in the act.

(2) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf car vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.

Laws 2010, LB650, § 24;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB223, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB814, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB98, § 4.